test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-TA-wicihew_gt-norm.yaml
Condfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wîcihêw - help him/her : # Wolvengrey VTA1 verb - Wolvengrey p. 401; Fut+Cond from Okimāsis pp. 79, 103

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwîcihâw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwîcihânân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihânaw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwîcihâwâw
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihitinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihitinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihitinâwâw
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihin
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: kiwîcihinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: kiwîcihinâwâw
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihêw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihêwak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihêyiwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimêw 
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimêwak 

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimâwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwîcihimânâna
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimânawa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwîcihimâwâwa
    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihêw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihêwak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihêyiwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimêw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimêwak
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikow
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikowak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyiwa
    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: ê-wîcihiyan
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1PlO: ê-wîcihiyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1PlO: ê-wîcihiyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: ê-wîcihiyêk
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: ê-wîcihitân
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2SgO: ê-wîcihitâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2PlO: ê-wîcihitâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: ê-wîcihitakok
    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: ê-wîcihak
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: ê-wîcihat
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: ê-wîcihâyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: ê-wîcihâyahk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: ê-wîcihâyêk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: ê-wîcihakik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: ê-wîcihacik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: ê-wîcihâyâhkik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: ê-wîcihâyahkok
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: ê-wîcihâyêkok
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimak
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimat
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimâyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimâyahk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimâyêk
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: ê-wîcihit
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: ê-wîcihisk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: ê-wîcihikoyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: ê-wîcihikoyahk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: ê-wîcihikoyêk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: ê-wîcihicik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: ê-wîcihiskik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: ê-wîcihikoyâhkik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: ê-wîcihikoyahkok
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: ê-wîcihikoyêkok
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: ê-wîcihimit
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: ê-wîcihimisk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: ê-wîcihikoyâhk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: ê-wîcihikoyahk
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: ê-wîcihikoyêk
    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihât
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihâcik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihâyit
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimât
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihimâcik
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: ê-wîcihikot
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: ê-wîcihikocik
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihikoyit
    

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihiyani
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihiyêko
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: wîcihitâni
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2SgO: wîcihitâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2PlO: wîcihitâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: wîcihitako
    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3Sg0: wîcihaki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3Sg0: wîcihaci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3Sg0: wîcihâyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3Sg0: wîcihâyahko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3Sg0: wîcihâyêko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3Pl0: wîcihakwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3Pl0: wîcihatwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3Pl0: wîcihâyâhkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3Pl0: wîcihâyahkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3Pl0: wîcihâyêkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyahko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyêko
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1Sg0: wîcihici
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2Sg0: wîcihiski
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1Pl0: wîcihikoyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12Pl0: wîcihikoyahko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2Pl0: wîcihikoyêko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1Sg0: wîcihitwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2Sg0: wîcihiskwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1Pl0: wîcihikoyâhkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12Pl0: wîcihikoyahkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2Pl0: wîcihikoyêkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihimici
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihimiski
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: wîcihikoyahko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: wîcihikoyêko
    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâtwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâyici
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâtwâwi
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikoci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikotwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyici
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkêk
    
    


    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwîcihik 
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwîcihikonân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwîcihikonaw
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâw
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikwak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikwak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonânak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwak
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihitin
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: kiwîcihitinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: kiwîcihitinâwâw
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikwak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyiwa
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwîcihikoyiwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwîcihikoyiwa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwîcihikonâna
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwîcihikonawa
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwîcihikowâwa
    
    
    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihak, êwîcihak]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: [ê-wîcihat, êwîcihat]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyâhk, êwîcihâyâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyahk, êwîcihâyahk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihâyêk, êwîcihâyêk]

    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihakik, êwîcihakik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: [ê-wîcihacik, êwîcihacik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyâhkik, êwîcihâyâhkik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyahkok, êwîcihâyahkok]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihâyêkok, êwîcihâyêkok] 
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiyan, êwîcihiyan]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihiyâhk, êwîcihiyâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihiyêk, êwîcihiyêk]    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihât, êwîcihât]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihâcik, êwîcihâcik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimât, êwîcihimât]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimâcik, êwîcihimâcik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihâyit, êwîcihâyit]
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimak, êwîcihimak]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimat, êwîcihimat]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimâyâhk, êwîcihimâyâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimâyahk, êwîcihimâyahk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihimâyek, êwîcihimâyek]
    
    
    
    
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: [ê-wîcihit, êwîcihit]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihisk, êwîcihisk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhk, êwîcihikoyâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahk, êwîcihikoyahk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêk, êwîcihikoyêk]

    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihicik, êwîcihicik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihiskik, êwîcihiskik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhkik, êwîcihikoyâhkik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahkok, êwîcihikoyahkok]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêkok, êwîcihikoyêkok]

    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: [ê-wîcihitân, êwîcihitân]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihitâhk, êwîcihitâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: [ê-wîcihitakok, êwîcihitakok]

    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [ê-wîcihikot, êwîcihikot]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [ê-wîcihikocik, êwîcihikocik]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyit, êwîcihikoyit]
    
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: [ê-wîcihimit, êwîcihimit]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: [ê-wîcihimisk, êwîcihimisk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyâhk, êwîcihikoyâhk, ê-wîcihikowâyâhk, êwîcihikowâyâhk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyêk, êwîcihikoyêk, ê-wîcihikowâyêk, êwîcihikowâyêk]
    PV/e+wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [ê-wîcihikoyahk, êwîcihikoyahk, ê-wîcihikowâyahk, êwîcihikowâyahk]





    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: wîcihak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihat
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyahk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyêk
